Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.550

Plans for repayment of operating agency obligations maturing prior to planned operation of plant.

Any municipal corporation, cooperative or mutual which has entered into a contract with an operating agency to participate in the construction or acquisition of an energy plant as defined in chapter 80.50 RCW shall annually adopt a plan for the repayment of its contractual share of any operating agency obligation which matures prior to the planned operation of the plant. The manner of adoption of the plan shall be subject to the laws regarding approval of rates of the municipal corporation, cooperative or mutual.

The plan shall include the effect of the means of repayment on its financial condition, its customers' rates, its other contractual rights and obligations, and any other matter deemed useful by the participant.

Each such participating municipal corporation, cooperative or mutual shall include a statement of the extent of its contractual obligation to any operating agency in an annual financial report.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 1 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 1st ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.52.250.